lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/3.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Sg +Pl %>
+Nom +Gen +Ine +Ela +Ill
%^WG %^A %^E %^V %^E2I %^AO %^HMETA
i2 t2 %^V

LEXICON Root

nouns ;

LEXICON nouns
pöytä 2TAVUISET ; 
kunta 2TAVUISET ; 
siili 2TAVUISET ;
bussi 2TAVUISET ;
sana  2TAVUISET ;



jalka:jalka 2TAVUISET_AO ;
silta:silta 2TAVUISET_AO ; ! t:l
parta:parta 2TAVUISET_AO ; ! t:r

auto:aut2o 2TAVUISET_O ; ! t2:t
ruoto:ruoto 2TAVUISET_O ; ! t:d
talo:talo 2TAVUISET_O ;



saari:saare 2TAV_E2I ;
joki:joke 2TAV_E2I ;
nuoli:nuole 2TAV_E2I ;
jälki:jälke 2TAV_E2I ;



maa 1TAVU ;
suo 1TAVU ;
työ 1TAVU ;
puu 1TAVU ;
tie 1TAVU ;


LEXICON 2TAV_E2I
+N+Sg+Nom:^E2I # ;
2TAV_OBL ;


LEXICON 2TAVUISET
+N+Sg+Nom: # ;
2TAV_OBL ;

LEXICON 2TAV_OBL
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n # ;
+N+Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A # ;
+N+Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A # ;
+N+Sg+Ill:%>h^V^Vn # ;
+N+Sg+Ess:%>n^A # ;

+N+Pl+Nom:^WG%>t # ;


LEXICON 1TAVU
+N+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n # ;
+N+Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A # ;
+N+Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A # ;
+N+Sg+Ill:%>h^Vn # ;
+N+Sg+Ess:%>n^A # ;

+N+Pl+Nom:^WG%>t # ;

LEXICON 2TAVUISET_AO
+N+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n # ;
+N+Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A # ;
+N+Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A # ;
+N+Sg+Ill:%>h^V^Vn # ;
+N+Sg+Ess:%>n^A # ;

+N+Pl+Nom:^WG%>t # ;
+N+Pl+Ine:^WG%>%^AO%>i2%>ss^A # ;

LEXICON 2TAVUISET_O
+N+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n # ;
+N+Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A # ;
+N+Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A # ;
+N+Sg+Ill:^E^V%n # ;
+N+Sg+Ess:%>n^A # ;

+N+Pl+Nom:^WG%>t # ;
+N+Pl+Ine:^WG%>i2%>ss^A # ;
